Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1302
Leases; required.

All departments, boards, and commissions of the State of Nebraska, except the Board of Educational Lands and Funds, the Department of Correctional Services, the Department of Health and Human Services, and the University of Nebraska shall cease operating any farm lands except as landlords under written leases by March 1, 1968, as provided in sections 72-1304 and 72-1305.

Laws 1967, c. 461, § 2, p. 1431;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 12;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 788.

Purpose of sections 72-1302 to 72-1304, see section 83-901.